Utah statutes.
45-1-307.   Copy of notice broadcast retained by station.

Each station which broadcasts any notice or material under this act shall retain a copy or transcript of the text or material broadcast for a period of six months after the broadcast.  The copy shall be available for public review at reasonable times and places.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 5, 2009 Special Session 1

